Hawaii statutes.
§328-62 Description of label. “Label”
means the information required in this part to be placed on any food products
by means of a stamp, stencil, or printing by machine, or by attaching to the
immediate package, by sign, handbill, placard, or otherwise, the words
“PREVIOUSLY FROZEN” in letter size easily seen under customary conditions of
purchase. [L 1967, c 206, pt of §1; HRS §328-62; am L 1980, c 40, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next